Tennessee, session 114, SB1281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-9-107, is amended by inserting
the following as a new subsection:
(e) Interest income accruing on investments and deposits as a result of
subsection (a) must be credited to a separate account for the purpose of carrying out
this section, must not revert to the general fund, and must be carried forward into each
subsequent fiscal year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1281
000785
- 1 -